Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2270.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-4-2 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-4 entitled "Situs and
Ownership of Taxable Property" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-4-2. Buildings on leased land deemed real estate.
Buildings on leased land, where the leases are in writing and recorded, are, for the purposes
of taxation, deemed real estate; provided, however, that in the town of South Kingstown, buildings
on leased land are, for the purposes of taxation, deemed real estate and shall be taxed to the owner
of the building as real estate, whether or not the leases are in writing or recorded.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage and shall apply to any assessment of
taxes currently under appeal at the time of enactment.
========
LC003981
========